District of Columbia statutes.
32-201

Employment of minors under 14 years of age; distribution of newspapers permitted.

Except as provided in §§ 32-206 and 32-207, no minor under 14 years of age shall be employed, permitted, or suffered to work in the District of Columbia, in, about, or in connection with any gainful occupation, with the exemption of housework performed outside of school hours in the home of the minor’s parent or legal guardian or agricultural work performed outside of school hours in connection with the minor’s own home and directly for the minor’s parent or legal guardian; provided, that minors 10 years of age and over may be employed outside of school hours in the distribution or sale of newspapers, subject to the provisions of §§ 32-215 to 32-221.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 998, ch. 908, § 1
June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(1), 23 DCR 512
Devices and safeguards, reports, records, see § 32-808.
This section is referenced in § 16-801, § 32-202, and § 32-207.
1981 Ed., § 36-501.
1973 Ed., § 36-201.